Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-956
Special election by mail; replacement ballot; how obtained; procedure.

(1) If a ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the registered voter, the voter may obtain a replacement ballot from the election commissioner or county clerk by signing a statement on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State that the ballot was destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received and delivering the statement to the election commissioner or county clerk.

(2) If the voter mails the statement or uses electronic mail or a facsimile machine for the submission of the statement, the election commissioner or county clerk shall not deliver a replacement ballot to the voter unless the statement is received prior to the close of business on the second Friday preceding the election.

(3) To receive a replacement ballot in person, the voter or an agent acting on behalf of a voter shall return the statement signed by the voter to the office of the election commissioner or county clerk by 5 p.m. on the day set for the election.

(4) The election commissioner or county clerk shall verify the voter's signature on the statement with the signature appearing on the voter registration records prior to issuing any replacement ballot.

(5) If the election commissioner or county clerk receives a statement meeting the requirements of this section, he or she shall deliver a replacement ballot to the voter if the voter is present in the office or shall mail a replacement ballot to the voter at the address shown on the statement. The election commissioner or county clerk shall keep a record of all replacement ballots issued under this section.

Laws 1996, LB 964, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 935, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 50;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 35;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 27.
April 16, 2026